Arkansas, session 2025, HB1559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-154. Inpatient treatment for substance use disorder —
Legislative findings.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Substance use disorder is a significant public health
concern in this state;
(2) Inpatient treatment for substance use disorders is an
essential component of comprehensive care;
(3) Currently, inpatient treatment for substance use disorder is
primarily funded through federal block grants; and
(4) Expanding coverage in the Arkansas Medicaid Program for
inpatient treatment for substance use disorder could improve access to care
*JMB396*
02/21/2025 11:23:46 AM JMB396

HB1559
and patient outcomes in this state.
(b) The Department of Human Services shall:
(1)(A) Develop and submit an application to the Centers of
Medicare & Medicaid Services for a demonstration waiver under section 1115 of
the Social Security Act, as in effect January 1, 2025, for exclusion of
institutions for mental diseases for inpatient treatment services of
substance use disorder within the program.
(B) The application described in subdivision (b)(1)(A) of
this section shall:
(i) Allow coverage for inpatient treatment of
substance use disorder in facilities that qualify as institutions for mental
diseases;
(ii) Expand access to medication-assisted treatment
for opioid use disorder;
(iii) Improve care coordination for beneficiaries
with substance use disorder; and
(iv) Develop intensive outpatient services designed
to reduce the need for inpatient treatment services;
(2) Consult with relevant stakeholders, including substance use
disorder treatment providers, patient advocacy groups, and behavioral health
experts in developing the waiver application described in subdivision
(b)(1)(A) of this section;
(3) Implement expanded coverage and services as authorized and
approved by the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services; and
(4) Report annually to the General Assembly on the status of the
waiver application described under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section, the
implementation progress, and outcomes of the expanded coverage.









02/21/2025 11:23:46 AM JMB396